apertium-hin.hin.dix
    <pardef n="गौ__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>एँ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>वों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="गेह/ूँ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ूँ</l><r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ूँ</l><r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ूँ</l><r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुँओं</l><r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="नकल__n_f">
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ें</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ख/ाँ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ाँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ेँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ेँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="वध/ू__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुएँ</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>ुयें</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुओं</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="जु/आ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="/ई__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयाँ</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="बिटि/आ__n_f">
      <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>आँ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="क/ई__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयाँ</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="अडबंग__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="खुशब/ू__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुएँ</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>ुयें</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुओं</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="कला/ई__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयाँ</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Paradigm Adjectives -->        

    <pardef n="गलत__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>  
   
    <pardef n="ऐसी/आ__adj">
      <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="कुछ__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

	<e lm="एशियाई"><i>एशिया</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="ऑस्ट्रेलियाई"><i>ऑस्ट्रेलिया</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="बैठक"><i>बैठक</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="गुरू"><i>गुर</i><par n="खुशब/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गफलत"><i>गफलत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तफतीश"><i>तफतीश</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पहुनाई"><i>पहुना</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जुआ"><i>जु</i><par n="जु/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="इकाई"><i>इका</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="अनुप्रयोग"><i>अनुप्रयोग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="संग"><i>संग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रोग्रामिंग"><i>प्रोग्रामिंग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="डब्ल्यू"><i>डब्ल्य</i><par n="खुशब/ू__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="तम्बाकू"><i>तम्बाक</i><par n="खुशब/ू__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="याहू"><i>याह</i><par n="खुशब/ू__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="विंग"><i>विंग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="यंग"><i>यंग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="ड्रग"><i>ड्रग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="उपवर्ग"><i>उपवर्ग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="मूल्यवर्ग"><i>मूल्यवर्ग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="बग"><i>बग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="हेतू"><i>हेत</i><par n="खुशब/ू__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="काबू"><i>काब</i><par n="खुशब/ू__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="सम्भोग"><i>सम्भोग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="रजाई"><i>रजा</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="कठिनाई"><i>कठिना</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="महाधमनीई"><i>महाधमनी</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="भालवाहीई"><i>भालवाही</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="दस्तंदाज़ीई"><i>दस्तंदाज़ी</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="पंखुड्ॅई"><i>पंखुड्ॅ</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="सेमीई"><i>सेमी</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="अंगड़ाई"><i>अंगड़ा</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="आलसीई"><i>आलसी</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="गुदगुदीई"><i>गुदगुदी</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="तमाशाई"><i>तमाशा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="दंगाई"><i>दंगा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="शैरीई"><i>शैरी</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="बढ़ई"><i>बढ़</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="भाई"><i>भा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="नीम-हकीमीई"><i>नीम-हकीमी</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बिनाई"><i>बिना</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="नकल"><i>नकल</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मिठाई"><i>मिठा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="हकीकत"><i>हकीकत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गुफ़्तगू"><i>गुफ़्तग</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="नववधू"><i>नववध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="उँचाई"><i>उँचा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तमाशाई"><i>तमाशा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="दारू"><i>दार</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खैरात"><i>खैरात</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="झाडू"><i>झाड</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="भई"><i>भ</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खाँ"><i>ख</i><par n="ख/ाँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="परछाई"><i>परछा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="भाई"><i>भा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लडाई"><i>लडा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कमान"><i>कमान</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दवादारू"><i>दवादार</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जोरू"><i>जोर</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बर्फ"><i>बर्फ</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खैरियत"><i>खैरियत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="रोशनाई"><i>रोशना</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="वधू"><i>वध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खुशबू"><i>खुशब</i><par n="खुशब/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="डाई"><i>डा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कसाई"><i>कसा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="टाई"><i>टा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बहू"><i>बह</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गेहूँ"><i>गेह</i><par n="गेह/ूँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लौ"><i>लौ</i><par n="गौ__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="अंग्रेज़"><i>अंग्रेज़</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="अरबों"><i>अरब</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वही"><i>वही</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="अंशजलीय"><i>अंशजलीय</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="ऊनप्रभावी"><i>ऊनप्रभावी</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="आग्रहपूर्ण"><i>आग्रहपूर्ण</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="अधपका"><i>अधपका</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="अप्रतिशोधित"><i>अप्रतिशोधित</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="क्षिप्र"><i>क्षिप्र</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="यौगिक"><i>यौगिक</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अननुकूल"><i>अननुकूल</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनेक"><i>अनेक</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गेरुआ"><i>गेरु</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उर्वर"><i>उर्वर</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अप्रियकर"><i>अप्रियकर</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कडुआ"><i>कडु</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कुछ"><i>कुछ</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
